North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 24. Trust Companies and Interstate Trust Business.
§ 53-366.
Applicability of other laws to authorized trust institutions; status of State trust company.

Except as otherwise provided in this Article, the following provisions of this Chapter and Chapter 53C of the General Statutes apply to authorized trust institutions:

, (2) Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 31, effective October 1, 2012.

(3)

G.S. 53C-7-205

.

(4)

through (6) Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 31, effective October 1, 2012.

(7)

Article 8 of Chapter 53C of the General Statutes, except where it clearly appears from the context that a particular provision is not applicable to trust business or trust marketing, and except that the provisions of this Article apply in lieu of the following provisions:

G.S. 53C-8-2

.

G.S. 53C-8-3

.

G.S. 53C-8-17

.

(8), (9) Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 31, effective October 1, 2012.

(10)

Article 14 of this Chapter.

(11)

G.S. 53C-2-7(b)

.

Rules adopted by the Commissioner to implement those provisions of this Chapter made applicable to authorized trust institutions by subsection (a) of this section also apply to authorized trust institutions unless the rules are inconsistent with this Article or it clearly appears from the context that a particular provision is inapplicable to trust business or trust marketing.

Activities of authorized trust institutions for clients shall not be considered money transmission under Article 16B of Chapter 53 of the General Statutes.

Until the Commissioner has issued new rules governing State trust companies, State trust companies are governed by rules issued by the Commissioner for banks acting in a fiduciary capacity, except to the extent the rules are inconsistent with this Article or it clearly appears from the context that a particular provision is inapplicable to the business of a State trust company.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, a State trust company is deemed to be all of the following:

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 31, effective October 1, 2012.

A “bank” for purposes of laws made applicable to authorized trust institutions in this section and for purposes of

G.S. 53-277

.

A trust company organized and doing business under the laws of North Carolina, a substantial part of the business of which is exercising fiduciary powers similar to those permitted national banks under authority of the Comptroller of the Currency, and subject by law to supervision and examination by the Commissioner.

A financial institution similar to a bank.

In the case of a State trust company controlled by a company that has declared itself to be a “financial holding company” under 12 U.S.C. § 1843(l)(1)(D)(i), deposits held for an account are deemed “trust funds” within the meaning of 12 U.S.C. § 1813(p) unless all fiduciary duties with respect to the account are explicitly disclaimed. This subsection does not prescribe the nature or extend the scope of any fiduciary duties; the nature and extent of any fiduciary duties with respect to deposits held for accounts are as provided by the instruments and laws applicable to those accounts.

Subject to any limitations contained in this Article, an authorized trust institution is a “trust company,” a “corporate trustee,” a “corporate fiduciary,” and a “corporation acting in a fiduciary capacity,” as these and similar terms are used in the General Statutes, except where it clearly appears from the context in which those terms are used that a different meaning is intended.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2012-56, s. 31; 2013-29, s. 22; 2021-93, s. 13.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-56, s. 31, effective October 1, 2012, rewrote subsection (a) to conform to the repeal of portions of Chapter 53 by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1; substituted “Article 16 of Chapter 53 of the General Statutes” for “G.S. 53-194” in subsection (c); and deleted subdivision (e)(1), which read: “Is a ‘banking entity’ for purposes of G.S. 53-127.”

Session Laws 2013-29, s. 22, effective April 16, 2013, added “and Chapter 53C of the General Statutes” in subsection (a); and added subdivision (a)(11).

Session Laws 2021-93, s. 13, effective July 22, 2021, deleted “shall” preceding “apply” in subsections (a) and (b); in subdivision (a)(7), deleted “shall” preceding “apply,” and inserted “the following provisions”; substituted “money transmission under Article 16B” for “the sale or issuance of checks under Article 16” in subsection (c); substituted “are governed” for “shall be governed” in subsection (d); and rewrote subsections (e) through (g).

§ 53-367.
Commissioner shall have supervision over authorized trust institutions and shall examine.

Every authorized trust institution shall be under the supervision of the Commissioner. The Commissioner may periodically examine and require reports from authorized trust institutions, and shall execute and enforce, through examiners and any other agents as are now or may hereafter be created or appointed, all laws and all rules, orders, and declaratory rulings relating to authorized trust institutions. All authorized trust institutions shall conduct their business in a manner consistent with all laws and all rules, orders, and declaratory rulings that may be adopted or issued by the Commissioner relating to authorized trust institutions.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-368.
Assessment of State trust companies.

For the purpose of operating and maintaining the office of the Commissioner, each State trust company shall pay into the office of the Commissioner, within 10 days after notice, an annual assessment of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) plus one dollar ($1.00) per one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of assets held for its accounts, exclusive of nonsecuritized real estate interests. For purposes of this assessment, the amount of assets held for accounts shall be determined as of the close of business on December 31 of each year.

If an application for merger, share exchange, sale of assets, change of control, conversion, or a similar transaction occasions an examination or if the Commissioner determines that the financial condition or manner of operation of a State trust company warrants further examination or an increased level of supervision, a State trust company may be subject to an additional assessment not to exceed the amount required of all State trust companies by subsection (a) of this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 32, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2007-55, s. 2; 2012-56, s. 32.

§ 53-369.
Administrative orders; penalties for violation; increase of equity capital.

In addition to any other powers conferred by this Chapter, the Commissioner may:

Order any authorized trust institution, or affiliate thereof, or any director, officer, or employee of an authorized trust institution, to cease and desist violating any provision of this Article or any rule issued thereunder.

Order any authorized trust institution, or affiliate thereof, or any director, officer, or employee of an authorized trust institution, to cease and desist from a course of conduct that is unsafe or unsound and which is likely to cause insolvency or dissipation of the assets of an authorized trust institution, or is likely to jeopardize or otherwise seriously prejudice the interests of the clients, creditors, shareholders, or the public in their relationships with the authorized trust institution.

Order any company to cease engaging in unauthorized trust activity.

Enter orders described in

G.S. 53-321

, 53-327, and 53-343.

The Commissioner may impose a civil money penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation of an order issued under subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section. The Commissioner may impose a civil money penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) per day for each violation of a cease and desist order issued under subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection (a) or this section. The clear proceeds of civil money penalties imposed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

The Commissioner may order that a State trust company in a hazardous condition increase its equity capital to a level that is adequate for the safe and sound conduct of its business. The order shall specify the period of time for meeting the requirement to increase equity capital, which period of time may be extended by further order of the Commissioner.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-370.
Notice and opportunity for hearing.

Consistent with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, notice and opportunity for hearing shall be provided before the Commissioner may act under the provisions of this Subpart. In cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, however, the Commissioner may take action without a hearing, but shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing upon request to rescind the action taken.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-371.
Removal of directors, officers, and employees.

The Commissioner may require the immediate removal from office of any officer, director, or employee of any State trust company, who shall be found to be dishonest, incompetent, or reckless in the management of the affairs of the State trust company, or who persistently violates the laws of this State or the rules, orders, and declaratory rulings issued by the Commissioner.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

Part 5. Dissolution and Receivership; Conservatorship; Jeopardized State Trust Companies.

Subpart A. Voluntary Dissolution and Liquidation.

§ 53-372.
Required vote of shareholders.

With the approval of the Commissioner, a State trust company may go into voluntary liquidation, be closed, and surrender its charter and franchise as a corporation of this State by the affirmative vote of its shareholders owning two-thirds of its stock.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-373.
Corporate procedure.

Shareholder action to liquidate a State trust company shall be taken at a meeting of the shareholders duly called by resolution of the board of directors. Notice of the meeting, stating the purpose of the meeting, shall be mailed to each shareholder, addressed to the shareholder’s last known residence at least 10 days prior to the date of the meeting. If the shareholders, by the required vote, elect to liquidate a trust company, a certified copy of all proceedings of the meeting at which the action was taken, verified by the oath of the president and secretary, shall be transmitted to the Commissioner for approval.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-374.
Authority to liquidate; publication.

If the Commissioner approves the liquidation, the Commissioner shall issue to the State trust company, under the Commissioner’s seal, a permit for liquidation. No permit shall be issued by the Commissioner until the Commissioner is satisfied that provision has been made by the State trust company to satisfy and pay off all creditors and to transfer all client accounts and fiduciary records to successor fiduciaries in the manner provided by

G.S. 53-383(c)

. If not so satisfied, the Commissioner shall refuse to issue a permit, and shall be authorized to take possession of the State trust company and its assets and business and to hold and liquidate the State trust company in the manner provided in this Part. When the Commissioner approves the voluntary liquidation of a State trust company, the directors of the State trust company shall notify clients of the State trust company in the manner prescribed by the Commissioner and shall cause to be published in a newspaper in the county in which the principal office of the trust company is located, or if no newspaper is published in that county, then in a newspaper having a general circulation in that county, a notice that the State trust company is closing down its affairs and going into liquidation and that creditors of the State trust company shall present their claims for payment. The notice shall be published once a week for four consecutive weeks.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-375.
Examination and reports.

When any State trust company is in the process of voluntary liquidation, it shall be subject to examination by the Commissioner and shall furnish any reports required by the Commissioner.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-376.
Unclaimed property.

All unclaimed property remaining with a State trust company voluntarily liquidated under the provisions of this Subpart shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 116B of the General Statutes.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

Subpart B. Seizure by Commissioner; Involuntary Dissolution and Liquidation.

§ 53-377.
When Commissioner may take charge.

The Commissioner may take possession of the business and property of any State trust company whenever it appears that the trust company:

Is in a hazardous condition;

Has become insolvent or is in substantial danger of becoming insolvent;

Has sold or attempted to sell substantially all of its assets or has merged or attempted to merge its business with another entity without meeting the requirements of this Article;

Has dissolved or liquidated or attempted to dissolve or liquidate without meeting the requirements of this Article; or

Has suspended operations.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-378.
Directors may act.

A State trust company may place its assets and business under the control of the Commissioner by a resolution of a majority of its directors upon notice to the Commissioner, and, upon taking possession of the State trust company, the Commissioner shall retain possession thereof until the State trust company is authorized by the Commissioner to resume business or until the affairs of the State trust company are fully liquidated as provided in this Subpart. No State trust company shall make any general assignment for the benefit of its creditors except by surrendering possession of its assets to the Commissioner as provided in this Subpart; and any other purported general assignment for the benefit of creditors by a State trust company shall be void.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-379.
Notice of seizure; bar to attachment of liens.

When the Commissioner takes possession of any State trust company under

G.S. 53-377

or

G.S. 53-378

, the Commissioner shall, within 48 hours, file with the clerk of the superior court in the county where the principal office of the State trust company is located a notice of the action which shall state the reason for the action, and which shall be deemed the equivalent of a summons and complaint against the State trust company in an action in the superior court except that it shall not be necessary to serve the notice. The taking possession of any State trust company shall be effective on the date when the authority is first exercised and from and after that time all assets and property of the State trust company, of whatever nature, shall be deemed to be in possession of the Commissioner, and the exercise of the authority shall operate as a bar to any attachment or other legal proceeding against the State trust company or its assets. After the Commissioner’s exercise of authority, no lien shall attach in any manner binding or affecting any of the assets of the State trust company, and every purported transfer or assignment made thereafter by the State trust company, or by its authority, of the whole or any part of its assets, shall be null and void; and the Commissioner shall be substituted in place of the State trust company in any civil actions or proceedings pending at the time of the exercise of the authority.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-380.
Notice to trust institutions, corporations, and others holding assets; existing liens.

Upon taking possession of the assets and business of any State trust company, the Commissioner shall forthwith give notice, by mail or otherwise, of the action to all banks, clearing corporations, brokers, trust institutions, or other persons or corporations holding, or having in possession, any assets of the State trust company. No lien against any assets of the State trust company shall be enforced in any manner other than as provided in this Article after the Commissioner has taken possession of the State trust company.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-381.
Permission to resume business.

After the Commissioner has taken possession of a State trust company under the provisions of this Subpart, the State trust company may resume business only upon approval and subject to terms and conditions specified by the Commissioner.

When possession of a State trust company has been taken pursuant to either

G.S. 53-377

or

G.S. 53-378

, the terms and conditions under which it may resume business shall be fully stated in writing, and a copy thereof shall be filed with the clerk of superior court of the county in which the action is pending.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, no State trust company possessed by the Commissioner under the provisions of this Article shall resume trust business unless and until the State trust company has been completely restored to solvency and it clearly appears to the Commissioner that the State trust company may be reopened with safety to the clients, creditors, and shareholders of the State trust company and to the public.

If the Commissioner determines that the State trust company shall not resume business, the State trust company shall be liquidated in accordance with the provisions of this Part and shall cancel the charter and revoke the license of the State trust company as provided in

G.S. 53-414

.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-382.
Remedy for seizure; answer to notice; injunction; appeal; and motions.

Whenever any State trust company of which the Commissioner has taken possession under

G.S. 53-377

shall deem itself aggrieved thereby, it may file an answer to the notice as in other civil actions and may also, upon notice to the Commissioner, apply to the resident or presiding judge of the superior court for an injunction to enjoin further proceedings by the Commissioner. The judge of the superior court may cite the Commissioner to show cause why further proceedings should not be enjoined and, after hearing the allegations and proof of the parties with respect to the condition of the State trust company, may dismiss an application for injunction or may enjoin further proceedings under the provisions of this section by the Commissioner. If the judge enjoins further action of the Commissioner and permits the reopening of the State trust company, the judge may require of the State trust company a surety bond as the judge deems necessary, payable to the Commissioner for the sole benefit of the creditors and clients of the State trust company and upon any terms the judge deems proper. Either party has the right to appeal a decision as in other civil actions.

The State trust company or any person interested may be heard by motion as to actions taken or proposed to be taken by the Commissioner, but the judge hearing the motion shall enter an order as in the judge’s discretion will best serve the parties interested.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-383.
Collection of debts and claims; Commissioner succeeds to all property of the State trust company.

Upon taking possession of the assets and business of any State trust company, the Commissioner is authorized to collect all money due the State trust company and to do any other acts necessary to conserve its assets and property. The Commissioner shall collect all debts due and claims belonging to the State trust company, and by order of the court may sell, compromise, or compound any bad or doubtful debt or claim or sell the real and personal property of the State trust company on any terms provided by the order. Where the sale is made under power contained in any mortgage or lien bond or other paper wherein the title is retained for sale and the terms of sale set out, sale may be made under that authority.

Upon taking possession of any State trust company under the provisions of this section, the Commissioner shall have the possession and the right to the possession of all the property, assets, choses in action, rights, and privileges of the State trust company. The property rights and privileges shall vest in the Commissioner absolutely for the purpose of liquidating, selling, or conveying the property rights and privileges, together with all other incidental rights, privileges, and powers necessary for the right of conveyance and sale.

Upon taking possession of any State trust company under the provisions of this section, the Commissioner shall administer each account of the State trust company on a temporary basis until either (i) a successor to the State trust company is appointed or the account is terminated in the manner provided by the terms of its governing instrument consistent with applicable law, or by applicable law in the absence of a provision in the governing instrument, or (ii) the Commissioner has granted the State trust company permission to resume business under the provisions of

G.S. 53-381

. The Commissioner may take appropriate steps for the appointment of successors or termination of accounts as the Commissioner deems necessary as to some or all of the accounts of the State trust company. If the governing instrument or other applicable law do not prescribe methods for appointing successors, or if the methods prescribed are unfeasible, the applicable law for appointment of a successor shall be as set forth in

G.S. 53-399

.

The officers and directors of any State trust company that is in the possession of the Commissioner under this Part shall not exercise any powers declared by this Subpart to be vested in the Commissioner.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-384.
Bond of the Commissioner; surety; condition; minimum penalty.

Upon taking possession of any State trust company, the Commissioner shall execute and file a bond payable to this State for the benefit of creditors, clients, and shareholders of the State trust company, with some surety company as surety thereon, with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the action is pending, conditioned upon the faithful performance of all duties imposed upon the Commissioner under the provisions of this Subpart with respect to the State trust company, the penal sum of the bond to be fixed by order of the Commissioner, which in no case shall be less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). Any person interested, by motion in the pending action, shall be heard by the resident or presiding judge of the superior court as to the sufficiency of the bond. The judge hearing the motion may fix the bond.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-385.
Inventory.

Within 90 days after the filing of a notice described in

G.S. 53-379

, the Commissioner shall file an inventory of the assets and liabilities, not including assets and liabilities held in accounts of the State trust company, of the State trust company. A copy of the inventory shall be filed with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the action is pending, and a copy shall be kept on file with the State trust company. The inventory shall be open for inspection during usual business hours, provided that nothing herein shall require the State trust company to remain open unnecessarily.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2012-56, s. 33.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-56, s. 33, effective October 1, 2012, substituted “G.S. 53-379” for “G.S. 53-279.”

§ 53-386.
Notice and time for filing claims.

Notice shall be given by advertisement once a week for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the county where the principal office of the State trust company is located, or if no newspaper is published in the county, then in some newspaper having a general circulation in the county, calling on all persons who may have claims against the State trust company to present them to the Commissioner at the principal office of the State trust company, and within the time to be specified in the notice which time shall not be less than 90 days from the date of the first publication. A copy of this notice shall be mailed to all persons whose names appear as creditors upon the books of the State trust company. Affidavit by the Commissioner to the effect that the notice was mailed shall be conclusive evidence thereof. For purposes of this section, clients and accounts of the State trust company shall not be considered creditors of the State trust company as to the assets held by the State trust company for the benefit of its accounts.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-387.
Power to reject claims; notice; affidavit of service; action on claims.

If the Commissioner doubts the validity of any claim, the Commissioner may reject the claim, in whole or in part, and serve notice of the rejection upon the claimant, either personally or by certified mail, and an affidavit of the service of the notice shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the action is pending and shall be conclusive evidence of the notice. Any action or suit upon a rejected claim shall be brought by the claimant against the Commissioner in the superior court of the county in which the action is pending within 90 days after service, or the action or suit shall be barred. Objections to any claim not rejected by the Commissioner may be made by any person interested by filing the objection in the pending action and by serving a copy thereof on the Commissioner. The Commissioner, after investigation, shall either allow the objection and reject the claim, or disallow the objection. If the objection is not allowed and the claim is not rejected, the Commissioner shall file a notice in the pending action and serve the notice upon the person making the claim and the person objecting to the claim. Within 10 days after the notice is filed, the person filing objection by motion in the pending action may question the validity of the claim, and the questions of law and issues of fact shall thereupon be determined as in other civil actions.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-388.
List of claims presented, copies, and proviso.

Upon the expiration of the time fixed for presentation of claims, the Commissioner shall make a full and complete list of the claims presented, including and specifying any claims that have been rejected. One copy shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the action is pending, and one copy shall be kept on file with the inventory in the principal office of the State trust company for examination. Any indebtedness against any State trust company which has been established or recognized as a valid liability of the State trust company before it went into liquidation, for which no claimant has filed claim, or any liability for which a claim has been filed and rejected, shall be listed by the Commissioner in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the action is pending. Any claim that may be presented after the expiration of the time fixed for the presentation of claims in the notice provided in

G.S. 53-386

shall, if allowed, share pro rata in the distribution but only as to those assets of the State trust company in the hands of the Commissioner that are undistributed at the time the claim is presented.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-389.
Declaration of dividends; order of preference in distribution.

At any time after the expiration of the date fixed by the Commissioner for the presentation of claims against the State trust company, and from time to time thereafter, the Commissioner may declare and pay dividends to the creditors and shareholders of the State trust company. In paying and calculating dividends, all disputed claims shall be taken into account, but no dividend shall be paid upon the disputed claims until the claims have been finally determined. The following shall be the order of preference in the distribution of the assets of any State trust company liquidated hereunder:

State, county, and federal taxes owed and fees due the Commissioner other than those due under the provisions of this Subpart;

Wages and salaries due officers and employees of the State trust company for a period of not more than four months;

Expenses of liquidation, including those described in

G.S. 53-391

and

G.S. 53-395

;

Amounts due creditors, honoring the priorities of valid security interests and subject to orders of the court concerning disputes among creditors;

Amounts due shareholders.

A statement of all dividends paid shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the action is pending, and the statements shall show the expenses deducted and the disputed claims in determining dividends.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-390.
Deposit of funds collected.

All funds collected by the Commissioner, in liquidating any State trust company, shall be deposited from time to time in a bank as may be selected by the Commissioner and shall be subject to withdrawal by check of the Commissioner.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-391.
Employment of counsel, accountants, and other experts; compensation.

The Commissioner, for the purpose of exercising any power under the provisions of this Subpart, may (i) employ any liquidating agents, attorneys, accountants, consultants, and clerks necessary to properly conduct the business of or liquidate and distribute the assets of a State trust company; (ii) fix the compensation for the agents, attorneys, accountants, consultants, and clerks; and (iii) pay the compensation of those persons out of the assets of the State trust company. Provided, that all expenditures described in this section shall be approved by the resident or presiding judge in the county in which the action is pending. Payments made by the Commissioner pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the requirements of Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. As used in this Subpart, the term “Commissioner” includes the Commissioner’s duly appointed agents. The Commissioner shall: (i) submit all proposed agreements or contracts for supplies, materials, printing, equipment, and contractual services that exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) authorized by this section to the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee for review as provided in

G.S. 114-8.3

; and (ii) include in all agreements or contracts to be awarded by the Commissioner under this section a standard clause which provides that the State Auditor and internal auditors of the Commissioner may audit the records of the contractor during and after the term of the agreement or contract to verify accounts and data affecting fees and performance. The Commissioner shall not award a cost plus percentage of cost agreement or contract for any purpose.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2010-194, s. 4; 2011-326, s. 15(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-194, s. 4, effective October 1, 2010, and applicable to all contracts proposed or awarded on or after that date, added the last two sentences.

Session Laws 2011-326, s. 15(d), effective June 27, 2011, in the next-to-last sentence, deleted “statewide and agency term” following “proposed” and inserted “and after.”

§ 53-392.
Unclaimed dividends held in trust.

Unclaimed dividends for claims described in subdivisions (a)(1) through (a)(4) of

G.S. 53-389

shall be held by the Commissioner in trust for the claimants to whom the dividends are owed; and the dividends so held by the Commissioner shall be paid over to the persons entitled to the dividends when they furnish satisfactory evidence of their right to the dividends. In case of doubtful or conflicting claims, the Commissioner may apply to the superior court, by motion in the pending action, for an order from the resident or presiding judge of the superior court directing the payment of the dividends so claimed. Issues of fact raised by motion may, upon request of any claimant, be determined as in other civil actions. Interest earned on any unclaimed dividends so held shall be applied toward defraying the expenses incurred in the distribution of the unclaimed dividends. The balance of interest, if any, shall be deposited and held as other funds to the credit of the Commissioner. After the Commissioner has held any unclaimed dividends in trust under the provisions of this statute for the creditors of the liquidated State trust company for a period of three years following the resumption of business by or cancellation of the charter of the State trust company, the unclaimed dividends shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 116B of the General Statutes. Upon payment of unclaimed dividends to the State Treasurer, the Commissioner shall be fully discharged from all further liability therefor.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-393.
Action by the Commissioner following full settlement.

Whenever the Commissioner has paid all duly proven and allowed claims described in subdivisions (a)(1) through (a)(4) of

G.S. 53-389

, has made proper provision for unclaimed and unpaid and disputed claims, and has other assets of the State trust company, the Commissioner shall, unless the State trust company is granted permission to resume business in accordance with

G.S. 53-381

, call a meeting of the shareholders of the State trust company by giving notice thereof by publication once a week for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the county, or if no newspaper is published in the county, then in a newspaper having general circulation in the county, and by mailing a copy of the notice to each shareholder’s address as it appears on the books of the State trust company. Affidavit of the mailing of the notice herein required and of the newspaper as to the publication shall be conclusive evidence of notice hereunder. At the meeting, any shareholders may be represented by proxy and the shareholders shall elect, by a majority vote of the shares present, an agent or agents who shall be authorized to receive from the Commissioner all the remaining assets of the State trust company. The shareholders also may specify the means of resolving disputes between multiple agents and appointing successors to the agent or agents. The Commissioner shall cause to be transferred and delivered to the agent, or agents, all the remaining assets of the State trust company. The Commissioner shall thereupon cause to be filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the action is pending a full and complete report of all transactions showing the assets of the State trust company so transferred together with the name of the agent or agents giving receipt for the assets; and the filing of the report shall act as a full and complete discharge of the Commissioner from all further liabilities to the shareholders of the State trust company by reason of the liquidation of the State trust company. The agent shall convert the assets coming into the agent’s hands into cash, except as otherwise provided by the court upon motion in the cause made by a shareholder of the State trust company, and shall make distribution to the shareholders of the State trust company as herein provided. The agent shall file semiannually a report of all transactions with the superior court of the county in which the State trust company is located, and with the Commissioner, and shall be allowed for the services such fees, not in excess of five percent (5%) of receipts and disbursements, as may be fixed by the court. In case of death, removal, or refusal to act of any agent or agents elected by the shareholders, the Commissioner or any interested person may seek an order from the resident or presiding judge in the county in which the action is pending appointing a successor to the agent or agents as determined by the shareholders or, if no method was set forth by the shareholders, as determined by the court to be in the best interests of the shareholders. The court in its discretion may either appoint a successor or order the call of a further meeting of shareholders for the election of a successor and make any orders that are appropriate.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-394.
Annual report of the Commissioner; items included; reports of condition of State trust companies.

The Commissioner shall file, as a part of an annual report to the Governor, a list of the names of any State trust companies of which possession was taken and liquidated in the preceding year, the sum of unclaimed assets with respect to each State trust company, and all depositories of all sums coming into the hands of the Commissioner under the provisions of this Part.

The Commissioner shall, from time to time, compile and make available for public inspection reports showing the condition of State trust companies.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-395.
Compensation of the Commissioner’s office.

The office of the Commissioner, for services rendered in connection with the duties described in this Subpart, shall be entitled to actual expenses incurred in connection with the liquidation of each State trust company, including a reasonable sum for the time of the examiners and other agents of the Commissioner. The Commissioner may adopt rules or orders for fixing these expenses.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-396.
Exclusive method of liquidation.

No State trust company shall be liquidated other than as provided in this Part.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-397.
Disposition of books and records.

All fiduciary records relating to the administration of particular accounts shall be turned over to the successors in charge of administration of the accounts. All other books, papers, and records of a State trust company that has been finally liquidated shall be deposited by the receiver in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the action is pending, or in any other place as in the clerk’s judgment, after consultation with the Commissioner, will provide for the proper safekeeping and protection of those books, papers, and records. Such books, papers, and records shall be held subject to the orders of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the action is pending, including orders necessary for preserving the confidentiality of any information relating to accounts contained in those books, papers, and records.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.